Wisconsin, session 2025, SB65.
do enact as follows:SB65,11Section 1. 349.115 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:SB65,2,112349.115 (1) A political subdivision may, by ordinance, authorize a law 3enforcement officer to impound any vehicle used in the commission of a violation of 4s. 346.62 or a local ordinance in strict conformity with s. 346.62 at the time of 5issuing a citation for the offense if the person cited is the owner of the vehicle and 6the person has a prior conviction for a violation of s. 346.62 or a local ordinance in 7strict conformity with s. 346.62 for which a forfeiture was imposed that has not been 8fully paid. The ordinance may provide for impoundment of the vehicle until the 9person fully pays the prior forfeiture amount and reasonable costs of impounding 10the vehicle, including towing or other transportation costs and storage costs, and 11any outstanding fine or forfeiture owed by the owner of the vehicle are fully paid.SB65,212Section 2. 349.115 (1m) of the statutes is created to read:SB65,3,213349.115 (1m) Upon impounding a vehicle under sub. (1), a law enforcement 14officer shall make a reasonable effort to determine if the vehicle has been reported 15as stolen. If the officer determines that the vehicle has been reported as stolen, the 16officer or political subdivision shall make a reasonable attempt to contact the 17owner. Notwithstanding sub. (2), the political subdivision shall return to its owner 18a vehicle reported as stolen and impounded under sub. (1) without the payment of a 19fee or charge. If a vehicle reported as stolen remains unclaimed for more than 60 20days after impoundment, the political subdivision may dispose of the vehicle 1following the same procedure as provided for disposing of an abandoned vehicle 2under s. 342.40.SB65,33Section 3. 349.115 (3) of the statutes is amended to read:SB65,3,84349.115 (3) A Subject to sub. (1m), a political subdivision that has 5impounded a vehicle under sub. (1) may dispose of the vehicle by following the same 6procedure as provided for disposing of an abandoned vehicle under s. 342.40 if the 7impounded vehicle remains unclaimed for more than 90 days after the disposition of 8the citation for which the vehicle was impounded.SB65,3,99